Washington statutes.
RCW 36.22.175

Surcharge for local government archives and records management—Records management training—Eastern Washington regional facility.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5167-S.SL) ***

(1)(a) In addition to any other charge authorized by law, the county auditor shall charge a surcharge of one dollar per instrument for each document recorded. Revenue generated through this surcharge shall be transmitted monthly to the state treasurer for deposit in the local government archives account under RCW 40.14.024. These funds shall be used solely for providing records scheduling, security microfilm inspection and storage, archival preservation, cataloging, and indexing for local government records and digital data and access to those records and data through the regional branch archives of the division of archives and records management.

(b) The division of archives and records management within the office of the secretary of state shall provide records management training for local governments and shall establish a competitive grant program to solicit and prioritize project proposals from local governments for potential funding to be paid for by funds from the auditor surcharge and tax warrant surcharge revenues. Application for specific projects may be made by local government agencies only. The state archivist in consultation with the advisory committee established under RCW 40.14.027 shall adopt rules governing project eligibility, evaluation, awarding of grants, and other criteria including requirements for records management training for grant recipients.

(2) The advisory committee established under RCW 40.14.027 shall review grant proposals and establish a prioritized list of projects to be considered for funding by January 1st of each even-numbered year, beginning in 2002. The evaluation of proposals and development of the prioritized list must be developed through open public meetings. Funding for projects shall be granted according to the ranking of each application on the prioritized list and projects will be funded only to the extent that funds are available. A grant award may have an effective date other than the date the project is placed on the prioritized list.

(3) In addition to any other surcharge authorized by law, the county auditor shall charge a surcharge of one dollar per instrument for every document recorded after January 1, 2002. Revenue generated through this surcharge shall be transmitted to the state treasurer monthly for deposit in the following accounts, fifty percent of the surcharge authorized by this subsection shall be reverted to the local government archives account as prescribed in RCW 40.14.024 for maintenance and operation of the specialized regional archive facility located in eastern Washington and fifty percent of the surcharge authorized by this section shall be reverted to the account created in RCW 43.07.410 for payment of the financing contract entered into by the secretary of state for the Washington state library-archives building.

(4) In addition to any other surcharge authorized by law, the county auditor shall charge a surcharge of one dollar per instrument for every document recorded. Revenue generated through this surcharge shall be transmitted to the state treasurer monthly for deposit in the local government archives account under RCW 40.14.024 to be used exclusively for the competitive grant program in RCW 40.14.026, and for the attorney general's consultation program and state archivist's training services authorized in RCW 42.56.570.

[ 2019 c 448 s 5; (2019 c 448 s 4 expired June 30, 2020); 2019 c 372 s 3; (2017 c 303 s 7 expired June 30, 2020); 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 931; 2008 c 328 s 6006; 2003 c 163 s 5; 2001 2nd sp.s. c 13 s 1; 1996 c 245 s 1.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 2019 c 372 s 3 and by 2019 c 448 s 5, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Effective date—2019 c 448 s 5: "Section 5 of this act takes effect June 30, 2020." [ 2019 c 448 s 12.]

Expiration date—2019 c 448 s 4: "Section 4 of this act expires June 30, 2020." [ 2019 c 448 s 11.]

Findings—Intent—2019 c 448: See note following RCW 43.07.405.

Effective date—2019 c 372 s 3: "Section 3 of this act takes effect June 30, 2020." [ 2019 c 372 s 4.]

Expiration date—2017 c 303 s 7: "Section 7 of this act expires June 30, 2020." [ 2017 c 303 s 10.]

Effective dates—2011 1st sp.s. c 50: See note following RCW 15.76.115.

Part headings not law—Severability—Effective date—2008 c 328: See notes following RCW 43.155.050.

Effective date—2001 2nd sp.s. c 13: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect June 30, 2001." [ 2001 2nd sp.s. c 13 s 3.]

Effective date—1996 c 245: See note following RCW 40.14.025.